California statutes. Financial Code
 by that former accountant. If there was any disagreement, the licensee’s written notice shall describe the reasons for the disagreement. The written notice shall be signed by the chief executive officer of the licensee. The licensee shall also request, in writing, that the former accountant furnish the licensee with a letter addressed to the commissioner stating whether the former accountant agrees with the statements contained in the licensee’s written notice. If the former accountant disagrees with any of the licensee’s statements, the former accountant’s letter shall explain the reasons for disagreeing with the licensee’s statements. The written notice of the licensee, along with the former accountant’s letter shall be filed with the commissioner no later than 30 days from the date of engagement of the new accountant.

(b) The written notice of the licensee required by subdivision (a) shall be considered a notice for purposes of Section
 17702.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 496, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17408.

(a) If any person subject to this division fails to make any report required by law or by the commissioner, the commissioner may immediately cause the books, records, papers, and affairs of said person to be thoroughly examined.

(b) The commissioner may
 impose, by order, a penalty on any person who fails, within the time specified in any written demand of the commissioner, (1) to make and file with the commissioner any report required by law or requested by the commissioner, or (2) to furnish any material information required by the commissioner to be included in the report. The amount of the penalty may not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each day for the first five days the report or information is overdue, and thereafter may not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each day the report or information is overdue.

(c) If, after an order has been made under subdivision (b), a request for hearing is filed in writing within 30 days of the date of service of the order by the person to whom the order was directed, a hearing shall be held in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code,
 and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted under that chapter.

(d) If the person fails to file a written request for a hearing within 30 days of the date of service of the order, the order imposing the penalty shall be deemed a final order of the commissioner, and the penalty shall be paid within five business days.

(e) If a hearing is requested, the penalty shall be paid within five business days after the effective date of any decision in the case ordering payment to be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 257, second Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

17409.

(a) All moneys deposited in escrow to be delivered upon the close of the escrow or upon any other contingency shall be deposited and maintained in a noninterest-bearing demand or checking account in a bank, a state or federal savings bank, or a state or federal savings association or in a noninterest-bearing account subject to immediate withdrawal in an industrial loan company insured by the Federal Deposit
 Insurance Corporation and approved to receive those moneys by the commissioner. Thereafter, these moneys may be deposited in an interest-bearing account in a bank, a state or federal savings bank, a state or federal savings association, an industrial loan company approved to receive those moneys by the commissioner, or a state or federal credit union, if the depositor is qualified for membership under the bylaws of that credit union, and the moneys are maintained separate, distinct, and apart from funds belonging to the escrow agent. Those funds, when deposited, are to be designated as “trust funds,” “escrow accounts,” or under some other appropriate name indicating that the funds are not the funds of the escrow agent.

Upon request of the commissioner, a licensee shall furnish to the commissioner an authorization for examination of financial records of any trust funds or escrow accounts, maintained in a financial institution, in accordance with the procedures set
 forth in Section 7473 of the Government Code.

(b) A licensee engaged in the business of receiving escrows for deposit or delivery of the types specified in subdivision (c) of Section 17312 and of the types not specified therein shall maintain separate escrow trust accounts, for both types of escrow business in the same manner as provided in subdivision (a) of this section and Sections 17409.1, 17410, 17411, and 17411.1.

(c) Any agreement with a financial institution to establish a trust account pursuant to this section shall be accompanied by a letter from the licensee authorizing and requesting that the financial institution immediately notify the commissioner and Fidelity Corporation, in either electronic or paper form, when it becomes aware of either of the following:

(1) The closure of any account subject to this
 section, other than to transfer the funds to another designated trust account at the same financial institution in the name of the escrow agent or the remittance of the funds to the Controller’s office for escheat purposes.

(2) The occurrence of any overdraft balance in an account subject to this section.

This subdivision does not impose any duty or obligation on a financial institution to Fidelity Corporation, members of Fidelity Corporation, or the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 72.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

17409.1.

(a) Each person subject to this chapter shall maintain separate escrow trust accounts for each licensed location. Transfers between accounts are prohibited except by the actual writing of a check from one escrow to the other, and by depositing the check for the account of, and the writing of a receipt for the escrow to which the funds are being transferred. Each transfer shall be properly supported and documented in escrow files by inclusion of escrow instructions executed by the principals authorizing the transfer.

(b) With regard to Internet escrow companies, transfers to trust accounts by commercial banks and from operating accounts to cover losses may be made through wire transfer. Receipts for all these transactions may be maintained in electronic form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 437, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

17410.

(a) Escrow or trust funds are not subject to enforcement of a money judgment arising out of any claim against the licensee or person acting as escrow agent, and in no instance shall such escrow or trust funds be considered or treated as an asset of the licensee or person performing the functions of an escrow agent.

(b) Interest paid or payable on funds deposited in escrow by a licensee are not subject to enforcement of a money judgment arising out of any claim against the licensee or person acting as escrow agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 93.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

17411.

No person shall knowingly keep or cause to be kept any funds or money in any bank or state or federal savings and loan association under the heading of “trust funds” or “escrow accounts” or any other name designating such funds or money as belonging to the clients of any escrow agency, except actual escrow or trust funds deposited with such agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 475.)
-------------------------------------------

17411.1.

“Trust funds” or “escrow accounts” as used in Sections 17409, 17410, and 17411 shall include all funds required to be held by an escrow agent pursuant to a federal or state law, or requirement of a governmental agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 663, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

17414.

(a) It is a violation for any person subject to this division or any director, stockholder, trustee, officer, agent, or employee of any such person to do any of the following:

(1) Knowingly or recklessly disburse or cause the disbursal of escrow funds otherwise than in accordance with escrow instructions, or knowingly or recklessly to direct, participate in, or aid or abet in a material way, any activity which constitutes theft or fraud in connection with any escrow
 transaction.

(2) Knowingly or recklessly make or cause to be made any misstatement or omission to state a material fact, orally or in writing, in escrow books, accounts, files, reports, exhibits, statements, or any other document pertaining to an escrow or escrow affairs.

(b) Any director, officer, stockholder, trustee, employee, or agent of an escrow agent, who abstracts or willfully misappropriates money, funds, trust obligations or property deposited with an escrow agent, is guilty of a felony. Upon conviction, of an offense under this section or similar offenses specified in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 470), Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 484), or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 503) of Title 13 of Part 1 of the Penal Code, the court shall, in addition to any other punishment imposed, order the person to make full restitution, first to the escrow agent and then
 to Fidelity Corporation, to the extent it has indemnified the escrow agent. Nothing in this section shall be deemed or construed to repeal, amend, or impair any existing provision of law prescribing a punishment for such an offense.

(c) Any person subject to this division who knows of a person’s involvement in an abstraction or misappropriation of money, funds, trust obligations, or property deposited with a licensed escrow agent shall immediately report the abstraction or misappropriation in writing to the commissioner and to Fidelity Corporation. No person shall be civilly liable for reporting as required under this subdivision, unless the information provided in the report is false and the person providing false information does so with knowledge and malice. The reports filed under this section, including the identity of the person making the filing, shall remain confidential pursuant to state law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 423, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17414.1.

(a) Any person who has been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to any crime specified in subdivision (b) within the past 10 years, or has been held liable in any civil action by final judgment or any administrative judgment by any public agency within the past 7 years, of any of the provisions specified in subdivision (b) shall not serve in any capacity as an officer, director, stockholder, trustee, agent, or employee of an escrow agent, or in any position involving any duties with an escrow agent, in this state. This subdivision shall not apply to any person whose office, employment, ownership interest, or other participation in the business of a licensed escrow agent commenced prior to January 1,
 1992.

(b) (1) Subdivision (a) applies to criminal convictions of, pleas of nolo contendere to, or civil or administrative judgments entered for, any of the following offenses:

(A) Offenses specified in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1320) of Division
 1.1.

(B) Offenses specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 5300) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.

(C) Offenses specified in Article 8 (commencing with Section 14750) of Chapter 4 of Division 5.

(D) Offenses specified in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 17400), and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 6.

(E) Offenses specified in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 18435) of Division 7.

(F) Offenses specified in provisions of the laws of the United States added or amended by the federal Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery and
 Enforcement Act of 1989 (Public Law 101-73).

(G) Offenses involving robbery, burglary, theft, embezzlement, fraud, fraudulent conversion or misappropriation of property, forgery, bookmaking, receiving stolen property, counterfeiting, extortion, checks, credit cards, or computer violations specified in Section 502 of the Penal Code.

(2) For the purpose of this subdivision, an offense does not include a conviction for which the person has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation from a court of competent jurisdiction under Section 1203.4 or 4852.13 of the Penal Code or a similar certificate of rehabilitation obtained in a foreign jurisdiction.

(c) On and after January 1, 1992, any person who seeks employment
 by, or an ownership interest in, or other participation in the business of a licensed escrow agent shall, as a condition to obtaining that employment, interest, or participation, authorize Fidelity Corporation and the commissioner, or both, to have access to that person’s state and federal summary criminal history information, as defined in Section 11105 of the Penal Code, for purposes of determining whether the person has a prior conviction of, or pleaded nolo contendere to, a criminal offense specified in subdivision (b).

(d) On or before the 10th day of employment, each escrow agent shall obtain and forward to the commissioner the fingerprint images and related information of persons seeking employment by an escrow agent. The fingerprint images and related information may be submitted by certified mail, return receipt requested, or transmitted
 electronically, using the process established by the Department of Justice for requesting state and federal summary criminal history information. Persons who have previously submitted fingerprints or fingerprint images and related information to the commissioner may so notify the commissioner and need not submit additional fingerprint images and related information unless requested to do so by the commissioner. The commissioner shall provide written notice to both the escrow agent and to the person if any of the information received pursuant to this division shows that the person’s employment would be in violation of Section 17414.1, and the escrow agent shall deny the person the employment. A person whose employment is in violation of subdivision (a) shall not have access to trust funds or sign checks or otherwise perform any activities related to the processing of escrow transactions after the
 licensed escrow agent has been notified by the commissioner that the person’s employment is in violation of subdivision (a).

(e) Any state and federal summary criminal history information obtained pursuant to this section shall be kept confidential and a recipient shall not disclose the contents other than for the purpose of determining eligibility for employment by, acquisition of an
 ownership interest in, or other participation in, the business of a licensed escrow agent.

(f) The authority granted by this section to the commissioner or to Fidelity Corporation shall be in addition to any other authority granted by law to obtain information about any person who is subject to this division. This section shall not be construed to limit any authority of the commissioner or Fidelity Corporation otherwise provided by law.

(g) Any person who knowingly violates subdivision (a) or (d), including, but not limited to, any escrow agent who permits employment by, an ownership interest in, or other participation in, the business of an escrow agent in violation of subdivision (a) or (d) shall, upon conviction, be subject to punishment pursuant to Section
 17700. Any person who knows of a violation of subdivision (a) or (d) shall immediately report the violation in writing to the commissioner. A person shall not be civilly liable for reporting as required under this subdivision unless the information provided in the report is false, and the person providing false information does so with knowledge and malice. The reports filed under this section, including the identity of the person making the filing, shall remain confidential pursuant to state law.

(h) This section shall not be construed to permit the reinstatement of any person barred by the commissioner pursuant to Section 17423 nor to prohibit the commissioner from bringing any action pursuant to Section 17423.

(i) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to
 any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this section which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 846, Sec. 1.   (SB 1348)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17414.2.

(a) In response to any written request by an escrow agent or by Fidelity Corporation, any bank, savings association, credit union, any other financial institution, or any other exempt person specified in Section 17006, an escrow agent or Fidelity Corporation may provide a written employment reference that advises of the person’s involvement in a crime or act specified in Section 17414 or subdivision (b) of Section 17414.1, or any theft, embezzlement, misappropriation, or other defalcation which has been reported to federal authorities pursuant to federal banking guidelines, or that has been reported to the commissioner or Fidelity
 Corporation, pursuant to this division. In order for the immunity provided in subdivision (b) to apply, a copy of the written employment reference shall be sent concurrently by the Fidelity Corporation, person, entity, escrow agent, bank, savings association, credit union, any other financial institution, or exempt person specified in Section 17006 providing the reference, to the last known address of the person concerning whom the reference is provided. 

(b) No licensed escrow agent, bank, savings association, credit union, any other financial institution, exempt person specified in Section 17006, or Fidelity Corporation shall be civilly liable for providing an employment reference as specified in subdivision (a), unless the information provided is false and the licensed escrow agent, bank, savings association, credit union, any other financial institution, or exempt person specified in Section 17006, or Fidelity Corporation providing false
 information does so with knowledge and malice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1221, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

17415.

(a) If the commissioner, as a result of any examination or from any report made to the commissioner, shall find that any person subject to this division is in an insolvent condition, is conducting or has conducted escrow business in such an unsafe or injurious manner as to render further operations hazardous to the public or to customers, is failing or has failed to comply with the provisions of Section 17212.1 or 17414.1, is permitting or has permitted its tangible net worth to be lower than the minimum required by law, is failing or has failed to maintain its liquid assets in excess of current liabilities as set forth in Section 17210, or is failing or has failed to comply with the bonding requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 17200) of this division, the commissioner may, by an order addressed to and served by
 registered or certified mail or by personal service on such person and on any other person having in their possession or control any escrowed funds, trust funds, or other property deposited in escrow with said person, direct discontinuance of the disbursement of trust funds by the parties or any of them, the receipt of trust funds, the delivery or recording of documents received in escrow, or other business operations. No person having in their possession any of these funds or documents shall be liable for failure to comply with the order unless they received written notice of the order. Subject to subdivision (b), the order shall remain in effect until set aside by the commissioner in whole or in part, the person is the subject of an order for relief in bankruptcy, or pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 17621) of this division the commissioner has assumed possession of the escrow agent.

(b) Within 15 days from the date of an order
 pursuant to subdivision (a), the person may request a hearing under the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Upon receipt of a request, the matter shall be set for hearing to commence within 30 days after such receipt unless the person subject to this division consents to a later date. If no hearing is requested within 15 days after the mailing or service of such notice and none is ordered by the commissioner, the failure to request a hearing shall constitute a waiver of the right to a hearing. Neither the request for a hearing nor the hearing itself shall stay the order issued by the commissioner under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 188, Sec. 9.   (AB 2433)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17416.

Whenever in the opinion of the commissioner any person, except as named in Section 17006, is engaged, either actually or through subterfuge, in the business of receiving escrows for deposit or delivery as defined in this division, without a license from the commissioner the commissioner may order that person to desist and to refrain from engaging in that business. If, within 30 days after such an order is served, a request for a hearing is filed in writing and the hearing is not held within 60 days thereafter, the order is rescinded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

17419.

On and after January 1, 1992, any person seeking employment with an escrow agent shall complete an employment application on or before
 the first day of employment which includes, at least, the following information. A copy of the employment application shall be forwarded to the commissioner on or before the first day of the applicant’s employment. Persons required to file a statement of identity and questionnaire pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 17209 or Section 17212.1 are not required to file the employment application set forth in this section. Each person completing the employment application shall be given the notice required by the Information Practices Act (Section 1798.17 of the Civil Code), copies of which may be obtained from the commissioner. Nothing in this section shall limit an escrow agent from requesting additional information from an applicant. STATEMENT OF IDENTITY
AND
 EMPLOYMENT APPLICATIONName of Escrow Company:Escrow Agent License Number:1. Exact Full Name:
 (Please Print or Type)First NameMiddle NameLast Name(Do not use
 initials or nicknames) Title of position to be filled in connection with the preparation of this employment application.
 

 2. Employment for the last 10 years:FromToEmployer Name and AddressOccupation and DutiesPresent NOTE: Attach separate schedule if space is not adequate. 3. Residence addresses for the last 10 years:FromToStreetCityStatePresent NOTE: Attach separate schedule if space is not adequate. 4. Have you ever been named in any order, judgment or decree of any court or any governmental agency or administrator, temporarily or permanently restraining or enjoining you from engaging in or continuing any conduct, practice or employment?( ) Yes ( ) NoIf the answer is “Yes,” please
 complete the following:Date of Suit:Location of Court (City, County, State):Nature of Suit:
 Note: Attach a certified copy of any order, judgment, or decree. 5. Have you ever been refused a license to engage in any business in this state or any other state, or has any such license ever been suspended or revoked?( ) Yes( ) NoIf the answer is “Yes,” please complete the following: 
 State: Title of State Department:
Nature of License and Number:

Note: Attach a certified copy of any order, judgment, or decree. 6. Have you ever been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to a crime other than minor traffic citations that do not constitute a misdemeanor or felony offense?NOTE: A conviction is a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. A conviction also includes an order granting probation and suspending the imposition of sentence, notwithstanding a subsequent order pursuant to Sections 1203.4 or 1203.4a of the Penal Code permitting the person to withdraw his or her plea of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.( ) Yes( ) NoIf the answer is “Yes,” please complete the following:Date of Case:Location of Court (City, County, State):Nature of Case:Note: Attach a certified copy of any order, judgment, or decree. 7. Have you ever been a defendant in a civil court action other than divorce, condemnation or personal injury?( ) Yes( ) No If the answer is “Yes,” please complete the following:Date of Suit:Location of Court (City, County, State):Nature of Suit:Note: Attach a certified copy of any order, judgment, or decree. 8. Have you ever changed your name or ever been known by any name other than that herein listed?(Including a woman’s maiden name) ( ) Yes( ) No If so, explain. Change in name through marriage or court order should also be listed. EXACT DATE OF EACH NAME CHANGE MUST BE LISTED.
 
 9. Have you ever done business under a fictitious firm name either as an individual or in the partnership or corporate form?( ) Yes( ) No If the answer is “Yes,” set forth
 particulars: 10. Have you ever been a subject of a bankruptcy or a petition in bankruptcy?( ) Yes( ) No If the answer is “Yes,” give date, title of case, location of bankruptcy filing: 11. Have you ever been refused a bond, or have you ever had a bond revoked or canceled?( ) Yes( ) NoIf the answer is “Yes,” give details: 12.In what capacity will you be employed? (e.g., Clerk, Escrow Officer, Receptionist,
 etc.)
 13. Do you expect to be a party to, or broker or salesperson in connection with, escrows conducted by the escrow company which is employing you?( ) Yes( ) No If the answer is “Yes,” please explain: NOTE: Attach separate schedule if space is not adequate.VERIFICATIONI, the undersigned, state that I am the person named in the foregoing Statement of Identity and Employment Application; that I have read and signed the Statement of Identity and Employment Application and know the contents thereof, including all exhibits attached thereto, and that the statements made therein, including any exhibits attached thereto, are true.Any person who knows or should have known of a violation of this section shall immediately report the violation in writing to the commissioner.I certify/declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of California that the foregoing is true and correct.
Executed at(City)(County)(State)thisday of, 20__.(Signature of Declarant)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 94.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

17420.

Except for the normal compensation of his own employees, it shall be a violation of this division for any person subject to this division to pay over to any other person any commission, fee, or other consideration as compensation for referring, soliciting, handling, or servicing escrow customers or accounts.

It shall also be a violation for any person to enter into any arrangement, either of his own making or of a subsidiary nature, or through any other person having a dual capacity, or through any person having a direct or indirect interest in the escrow, or other device permitting any fee, commission, or compensation which is
 contingent upon the performance of any act, condition, or instruction set forth in an escrow to be drawn or paid, either in whole or in part, or in kind or its equivalent, prior to the actual closing and completion of the escrow.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 475.)
-------------------------------------------

17421.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 17420, a disbursal, other than for a fee, commission or compensation may be advanced or paid out prior to the close of an escrow if the written instructions of all parties to the transaction so provide.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 996.)
-------------------------------------------

17421.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 17420, a licensee may charge a fee for administering an escrow that has been postponed for at least two months from the most recent closing date agreed upon by the parties in the written instructions or has been canceled if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The postponement or cancellation resulted from the acts or omissions of the parties to the escrow transaction.

(2) The
 fee was disclosed in the written instructions in not less than 8-point bold type on the face or front page of the instructions.

(3) The principal parties to the escrow transaction have executed the written fee instructions by initialing those instructions.

(b) This section shall apply to written instructions made on and after January 1, 2008.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 237, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

17422.

A joint control agent, unless acting pursuant to written instructions of his principals, shall not disburse funds for the payment of the cost of labor, materials, services, permits, fees, or other items of expense incurred in the construction of improvements upon real property until such time as he determines that the person furnishing such labor, materials, services, permits, fees, or other items has substantially complied with the specifications contained in the control agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------

17423.

(a) The commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing, by order, censure or suspend for a period not exceeding 12 months, or bar from any position of employment, management, or control any escrow agent, or any other person, if the commissioner finds either of the following:

(1) That the censure, suspension, or bar is in the public interest and that the person has committed or caused a violation of this division or rule or order of the commissioner, which
 violation was either known or should have been known by the person committing or causing it or has caused material damage to the escrow agent or to the public. 

(2) That the person has been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to any crime, or has been held liable in any civil action by final judgment, or any administrative judgment by any public agency, if that crime or civil or administrative judgment involved any offense specified in subdivision (b) of Section 17414.1, or any other offense reasonably related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in the business in accordance with the provisions of this division.

(b) Within 15 days from the date of a notice of intention to issue an order pursuant to subdivision (a), the person may request a hearing under the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 3 of
 Title 2 of the Government Code). Upon receipt of a request, the matter shall be set for hearing to commence within 30 days after such receipt unless the person subject to this division consents to a later date. If no hearing is requested within 15 days after the mailing or service of such notice and none is ordered by the commissioner, the failure to request a hearing shall constitute a waiver of the right to a hearing. 

(c) Upon receipt of a notice of intention to issue an order pursuant to this section, the person who is the subject of the proposed order is immediately prohibited from engaging in any escrow processing activities, including disbursing any trust funds in the escrow agent’s possession, custody or control, and the financial institution holding trust funds shall be so notified by service of the notice, accusation and other administrative pleadings. The prohibition against disbursement of trust funds may be set aside, in whole or
 in part, by the commissioner for good cause. 

(d) Fidelity Corporation shall disclose to all licensees the identity of persons who have been censured, suspended, or barred from any position of employment, management, or control. 

(e) Persons suspended or barred under this section are prohibited from participating in any business activity of a licensed escrow agent and from engaging in any business activity on the premises where a licensed escrow agent is conducting escrow business. This subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit suspended or barred persons from having their personal escrow transactions processed by a licensed escrow agent. 

(f) This section shall apply to any violation, conviction, plea, or judgment occurring at any time prior to and after the enactment of this section.

(g) The provisions of Section 17414.1 exempting convictions for which a person has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation from the prohibition against serving as an officer, director, stockholder, trustee, agent, or employee of an escrow agent, or in any position involving any duties with an escrow agent, shall not apply to permit the reinstatement of any person barred by the commissioner pursuant to this section, nor to prohibit the commissioner from bringing any action pursuant to this section.

(h) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this section which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 625, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

17423.1.

(a) (1) Whenever the commissioner takes any enforcement or disciplinary action pursuant to Section 17423, upon the action becoming final the commissioner shall notify the Real Estate Commissioner and the Insurance Commissioner of the action or actions taken. The purpose of this notification is to alert the departments that enforcement or disciplinary action has been taken, if the person seeks or obtains employment with entities regulated by the departments.

(2) The commissioner shall provide the Real Estate Commissioner and the Insurance Commissioner, in addition to the notification of the action taken, with a copy of the written accusation, statement of issues, or order issued or filed in the matter and, at the request of the Real Estate
 Commissioner or Insurance Commissioner, with any underlying factual material relevant to the enforcement or disciplinary action. Any confidential information provided by the commissioner to the Insurance Commissioner or the Real Estate Commissioner shall not be made public pursuant to this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the disclosure of any underlying factual material to the Insurance Commissioner or the Real Estate Commissioner shall not operate as a waiver of confidentiality or any privilege that the commissioner may assert.

(b) The commissioner shall establish and maintain, on the internet website maintained by the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, a separate and readily identifiable database of all persons who have been subject to any enforcement or disciplinary action that triggers the notification requirements of this section. The database shall also contain a direct link to the databases, described
 in Section 10176.1 of the Business and Professions Code and Section 12414.31 of the Insurance Code and required to be maintained on the Web sites of the Bureau of Real Estate and the Department of Insurance, respectively, of persons who have been subject to enforcement or disciplinary action for malfeasance or misconduct related to the escrow industry by the Insurance Commissioner and the Real Estate Commissioner.

(c) There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against, the State of California, the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation, any other state agency, or any officer, agent, employee, consultant, or contractor of the state, for the release of any false or unauthorized information pursuant to this section, unless the release of that information was done with knowledge and malice, or for the failure to release any
 information pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 126.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17424.

(a) For any licensee, a disciplinary action taken by the State of California, another state, an agency of the federal government, or another country for an action substantially related to the activity regulated under this division may be grounds for disciplinary action by the commissioner. A certified copy of the record of the disciplinary action taken against the licensee by the State of California, other state, agency of the federal government, or other country shall be conclusive evidence of the events related therein.

(b) Nothing in this section shall preclude the commissioner from applying a specific statutory provision in this division providing for discipline against a licensee as a result of disciplinary action taken against a licensee by the State of California, another state, an agency of the federal government, or another country.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 473, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17425.

Any person subject to this division or any director, stockholder, trustee, officer, agent, or employee of that person who violates any provision of the federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act, as amended (12 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.), or any regulation promulgated thereunder, violates this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 237, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Revocation of License [17600. - 17609.2.]

17600.

(a) An escrow agent’s license remains in effect until surrendered, revoked, or suspended.

(b) A licensee that ceases to engage in the business regulated by this division and desires to no longer be licensed shall notify the commissioner in writing and, at that time, tender the license and all other indicia of licensure to the commissioner.
 Within 105 days of the written notice to the commissioner, the licensee shall submit to the commissioner, at its own expense, a closing audit report as of the date the license is tendered to the commissioner for surrender, or for another period as the commissioner may specify, to be performed by an independent certified public accountant. The closing audit shall include, but not be limited to, information required by the commissioner, a bank reconciliation of the trust account, and a verified statement from a certified public accountant confirming lawful disbursement of funds. A license is not surrendered until the commissioner has reviewed and accepted the closing audit report, a determination has been made by the commissioner that acceptance of the surrender is in the public interest, and tender of the license is accepted in writing by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 568, Sec. 3.   (SB 204)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

17601.
